Washington statutes.
RCW 34.05.060

Informal settlements.

Except to the extent precluded by another provision of law and subject to approval by agency order, informal settlement of matters that may make unnecessary more elaborate proceedings under this chapter is strongly encouraged. Agencies may establish by rule specific procedures for attempting and executing informal settlement of matters. This section does not require any party or other person to settle a matter.

[ 1988 c 288 s 106.]